Be It Enacted by the People of the State of Oregon:
SECTION 1.
Section 2 of this 2025 Act is added to and made a part  of ORS 678.010 to
678.410.
SECTION 2. A nonhuman  entity, including but not limited to an agent powered by arti-
ficial intelligence, may not use any of the following titles:
(1) Advanced Practice Registered Nurse or the abbreviation APRN;
(2) Certified registered nurse anesthetist or the abbreviation CRNA;
(3) Clinical nurse specialist or the abbreviation CNS;
(4) Licensed practical nurse or the abbreviation LPN;
(5) Registered nurse or the abbreviation RN;
(6) Nurse practitioner or the abbreviation NP;
(7) Certified medication aide or the abbreviation CMA; or
(8) Certified nursing assistant or the abbreviation CNA.
Enrolled House Bill 2748 (HB 2748-A) Page 1
Passed by House March 4, 2025
Repassed by House June 13, 2025
..................................................................................
Timothy G. Sekerak, Chief Clerk of House
..................................................................................
Julie Fahey, Speaker of House
Passed by Senate June 11, 2025
..................................................................................
Rob Wagner, President of Senate
Received by Governor:
........................M.,........................................................., 2025
Approved:
........................M.,........................................................., 2025
..................................................................................
Tina Kotek, Governor
Filed in Office of Secretary of State:
........................M.,........................................................., 2025
..................................................................................
Tobias Read, Secretary of State
Enrolled House Bill 2748 (HB 2748-A) Page 2